Alaska, session 34, HB320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 15.07.050(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) Registration may be made 05 (1) in person before a registration official or through a voter 06 registration agency; 07 (2) by another individual on behalf of the voter if the voter has 08 executed a written general power of attorney or a written special power of attorney 09 authorizing that other individual to register the voter; 10 (3) by mail; 11 (4) by facsimile transmission, scanning, or another method of 12 electronic transmission that the director approves; or 13 (5) by requesting to be registered as a voter on [COMPLETING] a 14 permanent fund dividend application form under AS 43.23.015. 15 * Sec. 2. AS 15.07.060(e) is amended to read: 01 (e) For an applicant requesting initial registration by mail, by facsimile or 02 other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS 15.07.050, or by 03 requesting registration on [COMPLETING] a permanent fund dividend application 04 form and including the information required under (a)(1) - (4) and (7) - (9) of this 05 section, the director shall verify the information provided in compliance with (a)(2) 06 and (3) of this section through state agency records described in AS 15.07.055(e). If 07 the applicant cannot comply with the requirement of (a)(2) of this section because the 08 applicant has not been issued any of the listed numbers, the applicant may instead 09 submit a copy of one of the following forms of identification: a driver's license, state 10 identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or 11 hunting or fishing license. 12 * Sec. 3. AS 15.07.070(i) is amended to read: 13 (i) The division shall register voters under (j) - (m) of this section who 14 request to be registered on a permanent fund dividend application form 15 submitted under AS 43.23.015 to the Department of Revenue. The director shall 16 treat an eligible permanent fund dividend applicant as a new or updated 17 registered voter, unless the permanent fund dividend applicant who requests to 18 be registered does not provide the information required under AS 15.07.060(a)(1) 19 - (4) and (7) - (9) [SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO RECEIVE A PERMANENT 20 FUND DIVIDEND IN ACCORDANCE WITH (j) - (m) OF THIS SECTION]. 21 * Sec. 4. AS 15.07.070(k) is amended to read: 22 (k) Upon receipt of the registration information, the director shall, as soon as 23 practicable and in accordance with a schedule established by the director by rule, 24 process the registration information received and notify, by United States mail and 25 any other means authorized by the director, each applicant who requested 26 registration of the applicant's registration status [NOT ALREADY REGISTERED 27 TO VOTE] at the address provided in the applicant's application 28 [(1) OF THE PROCESSES TO 29 (A) DECLINE TO BE REGISTERED AS A VOTER; 30 (B) MAINTAIN AN EXISTING VOTER REGISTRATION 31 OR BE NEWLY REGISTERED AT A VALID PLACE OF RESIDENCE 01 NOT PROVIDED IN THE APPLICANT'S APPLICATION; AND 02 (C) ADOPT A POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION; AND 03 (2) THAT FAILURE TO RESPOND TO THE NOTIFICATION 04 SHALL CONSTITUTE THE APPLICANT'S CONSENT TO CANCEL ANY 05 REGISTRATION TO VOTE IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION]. 06 * Sec. 5. AS 15.07.070(l) is amended to read: 07 (l) If an applicant requests [DOES NOT DECLINE] to be registered as a 08 voter, the [WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE DIRECTOR ISSUES THE 09 NOTIFICATION, THE APPLICATION UNDER AS 43.23.015 WILL 10 CONSTITUTE A COMPLETED REGISTRATION FORM. THE] name of the 11 applicant shall be placed on the master register if the director determines that the 12 person is qualified to vote under AS 15.05.010, and the director shall forward to the 13 applicant a registration card. If registration is denied, the applicant shall immediately 14 be informed in writing that registration was denied and the reason for denial. 15 * Sec. 6. AS 43.23.015(b) is amended to read: 16 (b) The department shall prescribe and furnish an application form for 17 claiming a permanent fund dividend. The application must include 18 (1) notice of the penalties provided for under AS 43.23.270; 19 (2) a statement of eligibility and a certification of residency; 20 (3) the means for an applicant eligible to vote under AS 15.05, or a 21 person authorized to act on behalf of the applicant, to request that the applicant be 22 registered as a voter, to furnish information required by AS 15.07.060(a)(1) - (4) and 23 (7) - (9), and to attest [AN ATTESTATION] that the [SUCH] information is true. 24 * Sec. 7. AS 43.23.101 is amended to read: 25 Sec. 43.23.101. Voter registration. The commissioner shall establish by rule a 26 schedule by which the commissioner [WILL PROVIDE, AND] shall provide, as soon 27 as [IS] practicable, the director of elections with 28 (1) electronic records from the permanent fund dividend applications 29 with [OF] the information required under [BY] AS 15.07.060(a)(1) - (4) and (7) - (9) 30 [,] and the attestation that the [SUCH] information is true [,] for each permanent fund 31 dividend applicant who requested to be registered to vote and is 01 (A) [IS] a citizen of the United States; and 02 (B) [IS] at least 18 years of age or will be within 90 days of the 03 date of the application; and 04 (2) the mailing addresses for all permanent fund dividend applicants. 05 * Sec. 8. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 06 read: 07 APPLICABILITY: PERMANENT FUND DIVIDEND APPLICATIONS. The 08 changes made by this Act apply to permanent fund dividend applications filed on or after the 09 effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.